Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.1985

Permanent retirement allowance adjustment.

The dollar amount of the temporary postretirement allowance adjustment granted by section 1, chapter 519, Laws of 1993 shall be provided as a permanent retirement allowance adjustment as of July 1, 1995.

[ 1994 c 247 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 247: See note following RCW 41.32.4991.

Temporary postretirement allowance—1993 c 519: See note following RCW 41.32.4991.